Illinois, session 104th, SB1705.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Video Gaming Act is amended by changing 5Section 35 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 40/35)7    Sec. 35. Display of license; confiscation; violation as 8felony. 9    (a) Each video gaming terminal shall be licensed by the 10Board before placement or operation on the premises of a 11licensed establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, 12licensed large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 13establishment, or licensed veterans establishment. The license 14of each video gaming terminal shall be maintained at the 15location where the video gaming terminal is operated. Failure 16to do so is a petty offense with a fine not to exceed $100. Any 17licensed establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, 18licensed large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 19establishment, or licensed veterans establishment used for the 20conduct of gambling games in violation of this Act shall be 21considered a gambling place in violation of Section 28-3 of 22the Criminal Code of 2012. Every gambling device found in a 23licensed establishment, licensed truck stop establishment,   SB1705- 2 -LRB104 03001 LNS 13019 b1licensed large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 2establishment, or licensed veterans establishment operating 3gambling games in violation of this Act shall be subject to 4seizure, confiscation, and destruction as provided in Section 528-5 of the Criminal Code of 2012. Any license issued under the 6Liquor Control Act of 1934 to any owner or operator of a 7licensed establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, 8licensed large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 9establishment, or licensed veterans establishment that 10operates or permits the operation of a video gaming terminal 11within its establishment in violation of this Act shall be 12immediately revoked. No person may own, operate, have in his 13or her possession or custody or under his or her control, or 14permit to be kept in any place under his or her possession or 15control, any device that awards credits and contains a 16circuit, meter, or switch capable of removing and recording 17the removal of credits when the award of credits is dependent 18upon chance. 19    Nothing in this Section shall be deemed to prohibit the 20use of a game device only if the game device is used in an 21activity that is not gambling under subsection (b) of Section 2228-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012. 23    A violation of this Section is a Class 4 felony. All 24devices that are owned, operated, or possessed in violation of 25this Section are hereby declared to be public nuisances and 26shall be subject to seizure, confiscation, and destruction as   SB1705- 3 -LRB104 03001 LNS 13019 b1provided in Section 28-5 of the Criminal Code of 2012. 2    The provisions of this Section do not apply to devices or 3electronic video game terminals licensed pursuant to this Act. 4A video gaming terminal operated for amusement only and 5bearing a valid amusement tax sticker shall not be subject to 6this Section until 30 days after the Board establishes that 7the central communications system is functional. 8    (b) (1) The odds of winning each video game shall be posted 9on or near each video gaming terminal. The manner in which the 10odds are calculated and how they are posted shall be 11determined by the Board by rule.12    (2) No video gaming terminal licensed under this Act may 13be played except during the legal hours of operation allowed 14for the consumption of alcoholic beverages at the licensed 15establishment, licensed fraternal establishment, or licensed 16veterans establishment. A licensed establishment, licensed 17fraternal establishment, or licensed veterans establishment 18that violates this subsection is subject to termination of its 19license by the Board. 20(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19.) 21    Section 10. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 22changing Sections 28-1 and 28-2 as follows: 23    (720 ILCS 5/28-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 28-1)24    Sec. 28-1. Gambling.   SB1705- 4 -LRB104 03001 LNS 13019 b1    (a) A person commits gambling when he or she:2        (1) knowingly plays a game of chance or skill for 3    money or other thing of value, unless excepted in 4    subsection (b) of this Section;5        (2) knowingly makes a wager upon the result of any 6    game, contest, or any political nomination, appointment or 7    election;8        (3) knowingly operates, keeps, owns, uses, purchases, 9    exhibits, rents, sells, bargains for the sale or lease of, 10    manufactures or distributes any gambling device;11        (4) contracts to have or give himself or herself or 12    another the option to buy or sell, or contracts to buy or 13    sell, at a future time, any grain or other commodity 14    whatsoever, or any stock or security of any company, where 15    it is at the time of making such contract intended by both 16    parties thereto that the contract to buy or sell, or the 17    option, whenever exercised, or the contract resulting 18    therefrom, shall be settled, not by the receipt or 19    delivery of such property, but by the payment only of 20    differences in prices thereof; however, the issuance, 21    purchase, sale, exercise, endorsement or guarantee, by or 22    through a person registered with the Secretary of State 23    pursuant to Section 8 of the Illinois Securities Law of 24    1953, or by or through a person exempt from such 25    registration under said Section 8, of a put, call, or 26    other option to buy or sell securities which have been   SB1705- 5 -LRB104 03001 LNS 13019 b1    registered with the Secretary of State or which are exempt 2    from such registration under Section 3 of the Illinois 3    Securities Law of 1953 is not gambling within the meaning 4    of this paragraph (4);5        (5) knowingly owns or possesses any book, instrument, 6    or apparatus by means of which bets or wagers have been, or 7    are, recorded or registered, or knowingly possesses any 8    money which he or she has received in the course of a bet 9    or wager;10        (6) knowingly sells pools upon the result of any game 11    or contest of skill or chance, political nomination, 12    appointment, or election;13        (7) knowingly sets up or promotes any lottery or 14    sells, offers to sell, or transfers any ticket or share 15    for any lottery;16        (8) knowingly sets up or promotes any policy game or 17    sells, offers to sell, or knowingly possesses or transfers 18    any policy ticket, slip, record, document, or other 19    similar device;20        (9) knowingly drafts, prints, or publishes any lottery 21    ticket or share, or any policy ticket, slip, record, 22    document, or similar device, except for such activity 23    related to lotteries, bingo games, and raffles authorized 24    by and conducted in accordance with the laws of Illinois 25    or any other state or foreign government;26        (10) knowingly advertises any lottery or policy game,   SB1705- 6 -LRB104 03001 LNS 13019 b1    except for such activity related to lotteries, bingo 2    games, and raffles authorized by and conducted in 3    accordance with the laws of Illinois or any other state;4        (11) knowingly transmits information as to wagers, 5    betting odds, or changes in betting odds by telephone, 6    telegraph, radio, semaphore, or similar means; or 7    knowingly installs or maintains equipment for the 8    transmission or receipt of such information; except that 9    nothing in this subdivision (11) prohibits transmission or 10    receipt of such information for use in news reporting of 11    sporting events or contests; or12        (12) knowingly establishes, maintains, or operates an 13    Internet site that permits a person to play a game of 14    chance or skill for money or other thing of value by means 15    of the Internet or to make a wager upon the result of any 16    game, contest, political nomination, appointment, or 17    election by means of the Internet. This item (12) does not 18    apply to activities referenced in items (6), (6.1), (8), 19    (8.1), and (15) of subsection (b) of this Section. 20    (b) Participants in any of the following activities shall 21not be convicted of gambling:22        (1) Agreements to compensate for loss caused by the 23    happening of chance, including, without limitation, 24    contracts of indemnity or guaranty and life or health or 25    accident insurance.26        (2) Offers of prizes, award, or compensation to the   SB1705- 7 -LRB104 03001 LNS 13019 b1    actual contestants in any bona fide contest for the 2    determination of skill, speed, strength, or endurance or 3    to the owners of animals or vehicles entered in such 4    contest.5        (3) Pari-mutuel betting as authorized by the law of 6    this State.7        (4) Manufacture of gambling devices, including the 8    acquisition of essential parts therefor and the assembly 9    thereof, for transportation in interstate or foreign 10    commerce to any place outside this State when such 11    transportation is not prohibited by any applicable Federal 12    law; or the manufacture, distribution, or possession of 13    video gaming terminals, as defined in the Video Gaming 14    Act, by manufacturers, distributors, and terminal 15    operators licensed to do so under the Video Gaming Act.16        (5) The game commonly known as "bingo", when conducted 17    in accordance with the Bingo License and Tax Act.18        (6) Lotteries when conducted by the State of Illinois 19    in accordance with the Illinois Lottery Law. This 20    exemption includes any activity conducted by the 21    Department of Revenue to sell lottery tickets pursuant to 22    the provisions of the Illinois Lottery Law and its rules.23        (6.1) The purchase of lottery tickets through the 24    Internet for a lottery conducted by the State of Illinois 25    under the program established in Section 7.12 of the 26    Illinois Lottery Law.   SB1705- 8 -LRB104 03001 LNS 13019 b1        (7) Possession of an antique slot machine that is 2    neither used nor intended to be used in the operation or 3    promotion of any unlawful gambling activity or enterprise. 4    For the purpose of this subparagraph (b)(7), an antique 5    slot machine is one manufactured 25 years ago or earlier.6        (8) Raffles and poker runs when conducted in 7    accordance with the Raffles and Poker Runs Act.8        (8.1) The purchase of raffle chances for a raffle 9    conducted in accordance with the Raffles and Poker Runs 10    Act. 11        (9) Charitable games when conducted in accordance with 12    the Charitable Games Act.13        (10) Pull tabs and jar games when conducted under the 14    Illinois Pull Tabs and Jar Games Act.15        (11) Gambling games when authorized by the Illinois 16    Gambling Act.17        (12) Video gaming terminal games at a licensed 18    establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, licensed 19    large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 20    establishment, or licensed veterans establishment when 21    conducted in accordance with the Video Gaming Act. 22        (13) Games of skill or chance where money or other 23    things of value can be won but no payment or purchase is 24    required to participate, except where participation in 25    such game of skill or chance is accomplished using a 26    gambling device prohibited by item (iii) of subsection (a)   SB1705- 9 -LRB104 03001 LNS 13019 b1    of Section 28-2. 2        (14) Savings promotion raffles authorized under 3    Section 5g of the Illinois Banking Act, Section 7008 of 4    the Savings Bank Act, Section 42.7 of the Illinois Credit 5    Union Act, Section 5136B of the National Bank Act (12 6    U.S.C. 25a), or Section 4 of the Home Owners' Loan Act (12 7    U.S.C. 1463). 8        (15) Sports wagering when conducted in accordance with 9    the Sports Wagering Act. 10    (c) Sentence.11        (1) Gambling is a Class A misdemeanor. A second or 12    subsequent conviction under subsections (a)(3) through 13    (a)(12), is a Class 4 felony.14        (2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subsection 15    (c), or anything else contained in this Section to the 16    contrary, a gambling offense involving a device described 17    in item (iii) of subsection (a) of Section 28-2 is a Class 18    4 felony. 19    (d) Circumstantial evidence.20    In prosecutions under this Section circumstantial evidence 21shall have the same validity and weight as in any criminal 22prosecution.23(Source: P.A. 101-31, Article 25, Section 25-915, eff. 246-28-19; 101-31, Article 35, Section 35-80, eff. 6-28-19; 25101-109, eff. 7-19-19; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.)   SB1705- 10 -LRB104 03001 LNS 13019 b1    (720 ILCS 5/28-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 28-2)2    Sec. 28-2. Definitions. 3    (a) A "gambling device" is: (i) any clock, tape machine, 4slot machine, or other machines or device for the reception of 5money or other thing of value on chance or skill or upon the 6action of which money or other thing of value is staked, 7hazarded, bet, won, or lost; (ii) or any mechanism, furniture, 8fixture, equipment, or other device designed primarily for use 9in a gambling place; or (iii) any vending or other electronic 10machine or device, including, without limitation, a machine or 11device that awards credits and contains a circuit, meter, or 12switch capable of removing and recording the removal of 13credits that offers a person entry into any contest, 14competition, sweepstakes, scheme, plan, or other selection 15process that involves or is dependent upon an element of 16chance for which the person may receive a gift, award, or other 17item or service of value if that offer is incidental to or 18results from: (A) the purchase of an item or service of value; 19or (B) the purchase or gratuitous receipt of a coupon, 20voucher, certificate, or other similar credit that can be 21redeemed for or applied towards an item or service of value 22from such machine or device or elsewhere. A "gambling device" 23does not include:24        (1) A coin-in-the-slot operated mechanical device 25    played for amusement which rewards the player with the 26    right to replay such mechanical device, which device is so   SB1705- 11 -LRB104 03001 LNS 13019 b1    constructed or devised as to make such result of the 2    operation thereof depend in part upon the skill of the 3    player and which returns to the player thereof no money, 4    property, or right to receive money or property.5        (2) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection 6    (a), a vending machine Vending machines by which full and 7    adequate return is made for the money invested and in 8    which there is no element of chance or hazard.9        (3) A crane game. For the purposes of this paragraph 10    (3), a "crane game" is an amusement device involving 11    skill, if it rewards the player exclusively with 12    merchandise contained within the amusement device proper 13    and limited to toys, novelties, and prizes other than 14    currency, each having a wholesale value which is not more 15    than $25.16        (4) A redemption machine. For the purposes of this 17    paragraph (4), a "redemption machine" is a single-player 18    or multi-player amusement device involving a game, the 19    object of which is throwing, rolling, bowling, shooting, 20    placing, or propelling a ball or other object that is 21    either physical or computer generated on a display or with 22    lights into, upon, or against a hole or other target that 23    is either physical or computer generated on a display or 24    with lights, or stopping, by physical, mechanical, or 25    electronic means, a moving object that is either physical 26    or computer generated on a display or with lights into,   SB1705- 12 -LRB104 03001 LNS 13019 b1    upon, or against a hole or other target that is either 2    physical or computer generated on a display or with 3    lights, provided that all of the following conditions are 4    met:5            (A) The outcome of the game is predominantly 6        determined by the skill of the player.7            (B) The award of the prize is based solely upon the 8        player's achieving the object of the game or otherwise 9        upon the player's score.10            (C) Only merchandise prizes are awarded.11            (D) The wholesale value of prizes awarded in lieu 12        of tickets or tokens for single play of the device does 13        not exceed $25.14            (E) The redemption value of tickets, tokens, and 15        other representations of value, which may be 16        accumulated by players to redeem prizes of greater 17        value, for a single play of the device does not exceed 18        $25.19        (5) Video gaming terminals at a licensed 20    establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, licensed 21    large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 22    establishment, or licensed veterans establishment licensed 23    in accordance with the Video Gaming Act. 24    (a-5) "Internet" means an interactive computer service or 25system or an information service, system, or access software 26provider that provides or enables computer access by multiple   SB1705- 13 -LRB104 03001 LNS 13019 b1users to a computer server, and includes, but is not limited 2to, an information service, system, or access software 3provider that provides access to a network system commonly 4known as the Internet, or any comparable system or service and 5also includes, but is not limited to, a World Wide Web page, 6newsgroup, message board, mailing list, or chat area on any 7interactive computer service or system or other online 8service.9    (a-6) "Access" has the meaning ascribed to the term in 10Section 17-55.11    (a-7) "Computer" has the meaning ascribed to the term in 12Section 17-0.5. 13    (b) A "lottery" is any scheme or procedure whereby one or 14more prizes are distributed by chance among persons who have 15paid or promised consideration for a chance to win such 16prizes, whether such scheme or procedure is called a lottery, 17raffle, gift, sale, or some other name, excluding savings 18promotion raffles authorized under Section 5g of the Illinois 19Banking Act, Section 7008 of the Savings Bank Act, Section 2042.7 of the Illinois Credit Union Act, Section 5136B of the 21National Bank Act (12 U.S.C. 25a), or Section 4 of the Home 22Owners' Loan Act (12 U.S.C. 1463).23    (c) A "policy game" is any scheme or procedure whereby a 24person promises or guarantees by any instrument, bill, 25certificate, writing, token, or other device that any 26particular number, character, ticket, or certificate shall in   SB1705- 14 -LRB104 03001 LNS 13019 b1the event of any contingency in the nature of a lottery entitle 2the purchaser or holder to receive money, property, or 3evidence of debt.4    (d) It is the intent of item (iii) of subsection (a) of 5this Section to prohibit any mechanism that seeks to avoid 6being considered a gambling device through the use of any 7subterfuge or pretense whatsoever. 8(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 101-87, eff. 1-1-20; 9102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.